Utah statutes.
41-1a-411.   Application for personalized plates -- Refusal authorized.

(1)  An applicant for personalized license plates or renewal of the plates shall file an application for the plates in the form and by the date the division requires, indicating  the combination of letters, numbers, or both requested as a registration number.

(2)  The division may refuse to issue any combination of letters, numbers, or both that may carry connotations offensive to good taste and decency or that would be misleading.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 1, 1992 General Session

